Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.405.475

Termination of certificated employee based on guilty plea or conviction of certain felonies—Notice to superintendent of public instruction—Record of notices.

(1) A school district superintendent shall immediately notify the office of the superintendent of public instruction when the district terminates the employment contract of a certificated employee on the basis of a guilty plea or a conviction of any felony crime specified under RCW 28A.400.322.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall maintain a record of the notices received under this section.

(3) This section applies only to employees holding a certificate or permit authorized under this chapter or chapter 28A.410 RCW who have contact with children during the course of employment.

[ 2009 c 396 s 9.]